District of Columbia statutes.
38-1001

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the phrase “Select Adult, Community, and Continuing Education Course” means an adult, community, and continuing education course which is either recreational or vocational in nature.

Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-221, § 2, 41 DCR 8047
1981 Ed., § 31-131.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-377 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 2. Plan to establish evening and weekend adult career technical education programs.
“(a) The Mayor shall develop and present to the Council a plan to establish evening and weekend adult career technical training at the Academy of Construction and Design at Cardozo Senior High School, the Hospitality High School at Roosevelt High School, and the Phelps Architecture, Construction and Engineering High School.
“(b) The plan shall establish a curriculum, framework, and an estimated cost to implement, beginning in the summer of 2009, evening and weekend adult career technical education classes for District residents at the Academy of Construction and Design at Cardozo Senior High School, the Hospitality High School at Roosevelt High School, and the Phelps Architecture, Construction and Engineering High School.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 17-377 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Get DC Residents Training for Jobs Now Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-649, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 907).